Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-401.11
Department of Veterans' Affairs; offices; employees.

Suitable offices shall be provided for the Department of Veterans' Affairs in the State Capitol. It may maintain necessary offices at such other places in the state as it may designate and may incur the necessary expense for office furniture, stationery, printing and other incidental or necessary expenses. It may employ such clerical and other employees and assistants as it may deem necessary for the proper transaction of its business.

Laws 1947, c. 306, § 12, p. 932.

Annual property inventory, requirement, see section 81-1118.02.

Basic workweek, see sections 84-1001 to 84-1005.

Qualifications of personnel, see section 80-410.